Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.212

Community revitalization financing—Public improvements.

In addition to other authority that a rural county library district or intercounty rural library district possesses, a rural county library district or an intercounty rural library district may provide any public improvement as defined under RCW 39.89.020, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public improvements as provided under RCW 39.89.050.

This section does not limit the authority of a rural county library district or intercounty rural library district to otherwise participate in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

[ 2001 c 212 s 11.]